Utah statutes.
26-9-1.   Assistance to rural communities by department.
The department shall assist rural communities in dealing with primary health
care needs relating to recruiting health professionals, planning, and
technical assistance. The department shall assist the communities, at their
request, at any stage of development of new or expanded primary health care
services and shall work with them to improve primary health care by providing
information to increase the effectiveness of their systems, to decrease
duplication and fragmentation of services, and to maximize community use of
private gifts, and local, state, and federal grants and contracts.
